Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.050

Examination—Required—When offered—Review.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter an applicant for license shall appear at a time and place and before such persons as the department may designate to be examined by written or practical tests, or both. Examinations in hearing aid specialist, speech-language pathology, and audiology shall be held within the state at least once a year. The examinations shall be reviewed annually by the board and the department, and revised as necessary. The examinations shall include appropriate subject matter to ensure the competence of the applicant. Nationally recognized examinations in the fields of fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments, speech-language pathology, and audiology may be used to determine if applicants are qualified for licensure. An applicant who fails an examination may apply for reexamination upon payment of a reexamination fee. The hearing aid specialist reexamination fee for hearing aid specialists and audiologists shall be set by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250.

[ 2014 c 189 s 5; 2002 c 310 s 5; 1996 c 200 s 6; 1993 c 313 s 2; 1989 c 198 s 3; 1983 c 39 s 5; 1973 1st ex.s. c 106 s 5.]

NOTES:

Work group—2014 c 189: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.